Massachusetts, session 194th, H2003.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 38B the following section:-
Section 38B ½. (a) For purposes of this section, the word “dangerous weapon” shall
include any weapon or object, including an object that is custom or homemade, which is
designed or intended to be used as a weapon.
(b) Any person in the custody of a correctional facility, including any jail, house of
correction, trial court detention facility or state prison, who possesses a dangerous weapon shall
be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 10 years or in the house of
correction for not more than 2 ½ years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both such fine
of 2

and imprisonment. Such sentence shall begin from and after all sentences currently outstanding
and unserved at the time the person commits the violation of this section.
of 2